Tennessee, session 114, SB1411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 13, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Educational employee" means a person who is employed by a
school; and
(2) "School" means all public and private schools that conduct classes in
any grade from kindergarten through grade twelve (K-12).
(b) A person commits assault against an educational employee who knowingly
causes bodily injury to an educational employee while the educational employee is
discharging or attempting to discharge the educational employee's official duties while:
(1) On the grounds of the school that employs the educational employee;
(2) At an activity that is sponsored by the school that employs the
educational employee;
(3) On equipment or a means of transportation that is provided by the
school that employs the educational employee; or
(4) At an official school bus stop for students who attend the school that
employs the educational employee.
(c) Assault against an educational employee is a Class E felony.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1411
001303
- 1 -